Utah statutes.
32B-4-508.   Offering or soliciting bribe, gift, or profits.

(1)  If a person sold, sells, offered for sale, or offers to sell an alcoholic product to the commission or department, that person may not offer, make, tender, or in any way deliver or transfer to a commissioner, the director, a department employee, or a law enforcement officer responsible for the enforcement of this title the following:

(a)  a bribe;

(b)  a gift, as defined in Section 67-16-5; or

(c)  a share of profits.

(2)  A commissioner, the director, a department employee, or a law enforcement officer responsible for the enforcement of this title may not knowingly solicit, receive, accept, take, or seek, directly or indirectly, any of the following from a person who sold, sells, offered for sale, or offers to sell an alcoholic product:

(a)  a commission;

(b)  compensation, as defined in Section 67-16-3;

(c)  a gift, as defined in Section 67-16-5; or

(d)  a loan.

(3)  A violation of this section is punishable under Section 67-16-12.



Enacted by Chapter 276, 2010 General Session

